Louisiana, session 2026, HB258.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:66(B) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 42:66(A)(11)
and (12), (Q), and (R) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§66. Exemptions
A. Nothing in this Part shall be construed to prohibit any of the following
classes of officials or employees from serving in other offices or employments:
* * *
(11) Members or officers of a volunteer fire department or a combination fire
department.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 258 ENROLLED
(12) Members, appointees, designees, or officers of any unpaid advisory
committee, project, working group, or commission.
B.(1) Nothing in this Part shall be construed to prevent a school teacher or
person employed in a professional educational capacity in a grade school, high
school, other educational institution, parish or city school board from holding at the
same time an elective or appointive office.
(2) Nothing in this Part shall be construed to prevent a person employed in
a professional educational capacity in this state from also serving as an engineer,
researcher, or related employee of the federal government concerning healthcare,
science, or technology, including for any collaborative program between the federal
government and a public institution of higher education.
(3) For purposes of this Subsection, "person employed in a professional
educational capacity" includes any person holding appointive office or employment
related to or directly affecting the curriculum or educational programs offered by the
institution or in a role requiring professional judgment and responsibility in
furtherance of the institution's educational mission.
* * *
Q. Nothing in this Part shall be construed to prohibit a person holding
employment in the judicial branch, including as judge ad hoc or pro tempore, from
holding at the same time a part-time appointive office in another branch as a
designee or appointed member or officer of any board, committee, task force, or
commission. A person serving as a judge ad hoc and compensated on a per diem
basis shall not be considered a public employee for the purposes of R.S.
42:1132(B)(4)(c).
R. Nothing in this Part shall be construed to prohibit a qualified court
reporter who holds employment in the federal government from serving at the same
time as a court reporter for a court in the judicial branch of this state or of a local
governmental subdivision.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 258 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.